Utah statutes.
58-67-306.   Status of licenses held on the effective date of this chapter.

An individual holding a current license as a physician and surgeon that was issued under any prior state law is considered to hold a current license in the same classification under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 248, 1996 General Session

